North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160D. Local Planning and Development Regulation.
Article 13. Additional Authority.

Part 1. Open Space Acquisition.

§ 160D-1301.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide a means whereby any local government may acquire by purchase, gift, grant, devise, lease, or otherwise, and through the expenditure of public funds, the fee or any lesser interest or right in real property in order to preserve, through limitation of their future use, open spaces and areas for public use and enjoyment.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1302.
Finding of necessity.

The General Assembly finds that the rapid growth and spread of urban development in the State is encroaching upon, or eliminating, many open areas and spaces of varied size and character, including many having significant scenic or aesthetic values, which areas and spaces if preserved and maintained in their present open state would constitute important physical, social, aesthetic, or economic assets to existing and impending urban development. The General Assembly declares that it is necessary for sound and proper urban development and in the public interest of the people of this State for any local government to expend or advance public funds for, or to accept by purchase, gift, grant, devise, lease, or otherwise, the fee or any lesser interest or right in real property so as to acquire, maintain, improve, protect, limit the future use of, or otherwise conserve open spaces and areas within their respective jurisdictions as defined by this Article.

The General Assembly declares that the acquisition of interests or rights in real property for the preservation of open spaces and areas constitutes a public purpose for which public funds may be expended or advanced.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1303.
Local governments authorized to acquire and reconvey real property.

Any local government may acquire by purchase, gift, grant, devise, lease, or otherwise, the fee or any lesser interest, development right, easement, covenant, or other contractual right of or to real property within its respective jurisdiction, when it finds that the acquisition is necessary to achieve the purposes of this Part. Any local government may also acquire the fee to any property for the purpose of conveying or leasing the property back to its original owner or other person under covenants or other contractual arrangements that will limit the future use of the property in accordance with the purposes of this Part, but when this is done, the property may be conveyed back to its original owner but to no other person by private sale.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1304.
Joint action by governing bodies.

A local government may enter into any agreement with any other local government for the purpose of jointly exercising the authority granted by this Part.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1305.
Powers of governing bodies.

A local government, in order to exercise the authority granted by this Part, may:

Enter into and carry out contracts with the State or federal government or any agencies thereof under which grants or other assistance are made to the local government.

Accept any assistance or funds that may be granted by the State or federal government with or without a contract.

Agree to and comply with any reasonable conditions imposed upon grants.

Make expenditures from any funds so granted.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1306.
Appropriations authorized.

For the purposes set forth in this Part, a local government may appropriate funds not otherwise limited as to use by law.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1307.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:

Open space or open area. — Any space or area characterized by great natural scenic beauty or where the existing openness, natural condition, or present state of use, if retained, would enhance the present or potential value of abutting or surrounding urban development or would maintain or enhance the conservation of natural or scenic resources. The terms also include interests or rights in real property and open space land or uses.

Open space land or open space uses. — Any undeveloped or predominantly undeveloped land in an urban area that has value for or is used for one or more of the following purposes:

Park and recreational purposes.

Conservation of land and other natural resources.

Historic or scenic purposes.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§§ 160D-1308 through 160D-1310.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Community Development and Redevelopment.

§ 160D-1311.
Community development programs and activities.

A local government is authorized to engage in, to accept federal and State grants and loans for, and to appropriate and expend funds for community development programs and activities. In undertaking community development programs and activities, in addition to other authority granted by law, a local government may engage in the following activities:

Programs of assistance and financing of rehabilitation of private buildings principally for the benefit of low- and moderate-income persons, or for the restoration or preservation of older neighborhoods or properties, including direct repair, the making of grants or loans, the subsidization of interest payments on loans, and the guaranty of loans.

Programs concerned with employment, economic development, crime prevention, child care, health, drug abuse, education, and welfare needs of persons of low and moderate income.

A governing board may exercise directly those powers granted by law to local government redevelopment commissions and those powers granted by law to local government housing authorities and may do so whether or not a redevelopment commission or housing authority is in existence in such local government. Any governing board desiring to do so may delegate to any redevelopment commission, created under Article 22 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or to any housing authority, created under Article 1 of Chapter 157 of the General Statutes, the responsibility of undertaking or carrying out any specified community development activities. Any governing board may by agreement undertake or carry out for another any specified community development activities. Any governing board may contract with any person, association, or corporation in undertaking any specified community development activities. Any county or city board of health, county board of social services, or county or city board of education may by agreement undertake or carry out for any other governing board any specified community development activities.

A local government undertaking community development programs or activities may create one or more advisory committees to advise it and to make recommendations concerning such programs or activities.

A governing board proposing to undertake any loan guaranty or similar program for rehabilitation of private buildings is authorized to submit to its voters the question whether such program shall be undertaken, such referendum to be conducted pursuant to the general and local laws applicable to special elections in such local government. No State or local taxes shall be appropriated or expended by a county pursuant to this section for any purpose not expressly authorized by

G.S. 153A-149

, unless the same is first submitted to a vote of the people as therein provided.

A government may receive and dispense funds from the Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) Section 108 Loan Guarantee program, Subpart M, 24 C.F.R. § 570.700, et seq., either through application to the North Carolina Department of Commerce or directly from the federal government, in accordance with State and federal laws governing these funds. Any local government that receives these funds directly from the federal government may pledge current and future CDBG funds for use as loan guarantees in accordance with State and federal laws governing these funds. A local government may implement the receipt, dispensing, and pledging of CDBG funds under this subsection by borrowing CDBG funds and lending all or a portion of those funds to a third party in accordance with applicable laws governing the CDBG program.A government that has pledged current or future CDBG funds for use as loan guarantees prior to the enactment of this subsection is authorized to have taken such action. A pledge of future CDBG funds under this subsection is not a debt or liability of the State or any political subdivision of the State or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or any political subdivision of the State. The pledging of future CDBG funds under this subsection does not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the State or any political subdivision of the State to levy or to pledge any taxes.

All program income from Economic Development Grants from the Small Cities Community Development Block Grant Program may be retained by recipient cities and counties in “economically distressed counties,” as defined in G.S. 143B-437.01, for the purposes of creating local economic development revolving loan funds. Such program income derived through the use by cities of Small Cities Community Development Block Grant money includes, but is not limited to, (i) payment of principal and interest on loans made by the county using CDBG funds, (ii) proceeds from the lease or disposition of real property acquired with CDBG funds, and (iii) any late fees associated with loan or lease payments in (i) and (ii) above. The local economic development revolving loan fund set up by the city shall fund only those activities eligible under Title I of the federal Housing and Community Development Act of 1974, as amended (P.L. 93-383), and shall meet at least one of the three national objectives of the Housing and Community Development Act. Any expiration of G.S. 143B-437.01 or G.S. 105-129.3 shall not affect this subsection as to designations of economically distressed counties made prior to its expiration.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1312.
Acquisition and disposition of property for redevelopment.

Any local government is authorized, either as a part of a community development program or independently thereof, and without the necessity of compliance with the Urban Redevelopment Law, to exercise the following powers:

To acquire, by voluntary purchase from the owner or owners, real property that meets any of the following criteria:

Blighted, deteriorated, deteriorating, undeveloped, or inappropriately developed from the standpoint of sound community development and growth.

Appropriate for rehabilitation or conservation activities.

Appropriate for housing construction or the economic development of the community.

Appropriate for the preservation or restoration of historic sites, the beautification of urban land, the conservation of open space, natural resources, and scenic areas, the provision of recreational opportunities, or the guidance of urban development.

To clear, demolish, remove, or rehabilitate buildings and improvements on land so acquired.

To retain property so acquired for public purposes, or to dispose, through sale, lease, or otherwise, of any property so acquired to any person, firm, corporation, or governmental unit, provided the disposition of such property shall be undertaken in accordance with the procedures of Article 12 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or the procedures of

G.S. 160A-514

, or any applicable local act or charter provision modifying such procedures, or subdivision (4) of this section.

To sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest therein in a community development project area to any redeveloper at private sale for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use in accordance with the community development plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions as may be deemed to be in the public interest or to carry out the purposes of this Article, provided that the sale, exchange, or other transfer, and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after approval of the governing board and after a legislative hearing. A notice of the hearing shall be given once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the local government’s planning and development jurisdiction area, the notice shall be published the first time not less than 10 days nor more than 25 days preceding the hearing, and the notice shall disclose the terms of the sale, exchange, or transfer. At the hearing, the appraised value of the property to be sold, exchanged, or transferred shall be disclosed, and the consideration for the conveyance shall not be less than the appraised value.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 43, 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1313.
Urban Development Action Grants.

Any local government is authorized, either as a part of a community development program or independently thereof, to enter into contracts or agreements with any person, association, or corporation to undertake and carry out specified activities in furtherance of the purposes of Urban Development Action Grants authorized by the Housing and Community Development Act of 1977, P.L. 95-128, or any amendment thereto, that is a continuation of such grant programs by whatever designation, including the authority to enter into and carry out contracts or agreements to extend loans, loan subsidies, or grants to persons, associations, or corporations and to dispose of real or personal property by private sale in furtherance of such contracts or agreements.

Any enabling legislation contained in local acts that refers to “Urban Development Action Grants” or the Housing and Community Development Act of 1977, P.L. 95-128, shall be construed also to refer to any continuation of such grant programs by whatever designation.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1314.
Urban homesteading programs.

A local government may establish a program of urban homesteading, in which residential property of little or no value is conveyed to persons who agree to rehabilitate the property and use it, for a minimum number of years, as their principal place of residence. Residential property is considered of little or no value if the cost of bringing the property into compliance with the local government’s housing code exceeds sixty percent (60%) of the property’s appraised value on the county tax records. In undertaking such a program, a local government may:

Acquire by purchase, gift, or otherwise, but not eminent domain, residential property specifically for the purpose of reconveyance in the urban homesteading program or may transfer to the program residential property acquired for other purposes, including property purchased at a tax foreclosure sale.

Under procedures and standards established by the local government, convey residential property by private sale under

G.S. 160A-267

and for nominal monetary consideration to persons who qualify as grantees.

Convey property subject to the following conditions:

A requirement that the grantee shall use the property as the grantee’s principal place of residence for a minimum number of years.

A requirement that the grantee rehabilitate the property so that it meets or exceeds minimum housing code standards.

A requirement that the grantee maintain insurance on the property.

Any other specific conditions, including, but not limited to, design standards, or actions that the local government may require.

A provision for the termination of the grantee’s interest in the property and its reversion to the local government upon the grantee’s failure to meet any condition so established.

Subordinate the local government’s interest in the property to any security interest granted by the grantee to a lender of funds to purchase or rehabilitate the property.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1315.
Downtown development projects.

Definition. — As used in this section, “downtown development project” or “joint development project” means a capital project, in a central business district, as that district is defined by the governing board, comprising one or more buildings and including both public and private facilities. By way of illustration but not limitation, such a project might include a single building comprising a publicly owned parking structure and publicly owned convention center and a privately owned hotel or office building.

Authorization. — If the governing board finds that it is likely to have a significant effect on the revitalization of the jurisdiction, the local government may acquire, construct, own, and operate or participate in the acquisition, construction, ownership, and operation of a joint development project or of specific facilities within such a project. The local government may enter into binding contracts with one or more private developers with respect to acquiring, constructing, owning, or operating such a project. Such a contract may, among other provisions, specify the following:

The property interests of both the local government and the developer or developers in the project, provided that the property interests of the local government shall be limited to facilities for a public purpose.

The responsibilities of the local government and the developer or developers for construction of the project.

The responsibilities of the local government and the developer or developers with respect to financing the project.Such a contract may be entered into before the acquisition of any real property necessary to the project.

Eligible Property. — A joint development project may be constructed on property acquired by the developer or developers, on property directly acquired by the local government, or on property acquired by the local government while exercising the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission pursuant to

G.S. 160A-505

or

G.S. 160D-1311

.

Conveyance of Property Rights. — In connection with a joint development project, the local government may convey interests in property owned by it, including air rights over public facilities, as follows:

If the property was acquired while the local government was exercising the powers, duties, and responsibilities of a redevelopment commission, the local government may convey property interests pursuant to the “Urban Redevelopment Law” or any local modification thereof.

If the property was acquired by the local government directly, the local government may convey property interests pursuant to

G.S. 160D-1312

, and Article 12 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes does not apply to such dispositions.

In lieu of conveying the fee interest in air rights, the local government may convey a leasehold interest for a period not to exceed 99 years, using the procedures of subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection, as applicable.

Construction. — The contract between the local government and the developer or developers may provide that the developer or developers shall be responsible for construction of the entire joint development project. If so, the contract shall include such provisions as the governing board deems sufficient to assure that the public facility or facilities included in the project meet the needs of the local government and are constructed at a reasonable price. A project constructed pursuant to this subsection is not subject to Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, provided that local government funds constitute no more than fifty percent (50%) of the total costs of the joint development project. Federal funds available for loan to private developers in connection with a joint development project shall not be considered local government funds for purposes of this subsection.

Operation. — The local government may contract for the operation of any public facility or facilities included in a joint redevelopment project by a person, partnership, firm, or corporation, public or private. Such a contract shall include provisions sufficient to assure that any such facility or facilities are operated for the benefit of the citizens of the local government.

Grant Funds. — To assist in the financing of its share of a joint development project, the local government may apply for, accept, and expend grant funds from the federal or state governments.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-1316.
Low- and moderate-income housing programs.

Any local government is authorized to exercise the following powers:

To engage in and to appropriate and expend funds for residential housing construction, new or rehabilitated, for sale or rental to persons and families of low and moderate income. Any governing board may contract with any person, association, or corporation to implement the provisions of this subdivision.

To acquire real property by voluntary purchase from the owners to be developed by the local government or to be used by the local government to provide affordable housing to persons of low and moderate income.

To convey property by private sale to any public or private entity that provides affordable housing to persons of low or moderate income under procedures and standards established by the local government, The local government shall include as part of any such conveyance covenants or conditions that assure the property will be developed by the entity for sale or lease to persons of low or moderate income.

To convey residential property by private sale to persons of low or moderate income, in accordance with procedures and standards established by the local government, with

G.S. 160A-267

, and with any terms and conditions that the governing board may determine.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§§ 160D-1317 through 160D-1319.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Miscellaneous.

§ 160D-1320.
Program to finance energy improvements.

Purpose. — The General Assembly finds it is in the best interest of the citizens of North Carolina to promote and encourage renewable energy and energy efficiency within the State in order to conserve energy, promote economic competitiveness, and expand employment in the State. The General Assembly also finds that a local government has an integral role in furthering this purpose by promoting and encouraging renewable energy and energy efficiency within the local government’s territorial jurisdiction. In furtherance of this purpose, a local government may establish a program to finance the purchase and installation of distributed generation renewable energy sources or energy efficiency improvements that are permanently affixed to residential, commercial, or other real property.

Financing Assistance. — A local government may establish a revolving loan fund and a loan loss reserve fund for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the purchase and installation of distributed generation renewable energy sources or energy efficiency improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, or other real property. A local government may establish other local government energy efficiency and distributed generation renewable energy source finance programs funded through federal grants. A local government may use State and federal grants and loans and its general revenue for this financing. The annual interest rate charged for the use of funds from the revolving fund may not exceed eight percent (8%) per annum, excluding other fees for loan application review and origination. The term of any loan originated under this section may not be greater than 20 years.

Definition. — As used in this Article, “renewable energy source” has the same meaning as “renewable energy resource” in

G.S. 62-133.8

.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).